District of Columbia statutes.
5-415

Services to District institutions located outside the District.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to make provisions and payment for the furnishing of fire prevention and fire protection services to District of Columbia government institutions located outside the District of Columbia.

Oct. 26, 1973, 87 Stat. 505, Pub. L. 93-140, § 8
1981 Ed., § 4-315.
1973 Ed., § 4-415.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.